Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 18
VEHICLES ABANDONED ON
PUBLIC PROPERTY

Editor's note:

This title was amended with relocations in 1994, and this part 18 was subsequently amended with relocations in 2002, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this part 18 prior to 2002, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume and the editor's note following the title heading. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated in 2002.

Cross references:

For provisions concerning vehicles abandoned on private property, see part 21 of this article.

42-4-1801. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby declares that the purpose of this part 18 is to provide procedures for the removal, storage, and disposal of motor vehicles that are abandoned on public property.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire part amended with relocations, p. 468, § 1, effective July 1.

42-4-1802. Definitions.

As used in this part 18, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Abandoned motor vehicle" means:

Any motor vehicle left unattended on public property, including any portion of a highway right-of-way, outside the limits of any incorporated town or city for a period of forty-eight hours or longer;

Any motor vehicle left unattended on public property, including any portion of a highway right-of-way, within the limits of any incorporated town or city for a period longer than any limit prescribed by any local ordinance concerning the abandonment of motor vehicles or, if there is no such ordinance, for a period of forty-eight hours or longer;

Any motor vehicle stored in an impound lot at the request of a law enforcement agency and not removed from the impound lot within seventy-two hours after the time the law enforcement agency notifies the owner or agent that the vehicle is available for release upon payment of any applicable charges or fees;

A motor vehicle fitted with an immobilization device that is on public property and deemed to be abandoned pursuant to section 42-4-1105 (7)(c); or

Any motor vehicle left unattended at a regional transportation district parking facility, as defined in section 32-9-119.9 (6), C.R.S., that is deemed to be abandoned pursuant to section 32-9-119.9 (4)(b), C.R.S.

"Agency employee" means any employee of the department of transportation or other municipal, county, or city and county agency responsible for highway safety and maintenance.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2009, (HB 09- 1279), ch. 170, p. 763, § 1, effective August 5, 2009.)

"Appraisal" means a bona fide estimate of reasonable market value made by any motor vehicle dealer licensed in this state or by any employee of the Colorado state patrol or of any sheriff's or police department whose appointment for such purpose has been reported by the head of the appointing agency to the executive director of the department.

"Disabled motor vehicle" means any motor vehicle that is stopped or parked, either attended or unattended, upon a public right-of-way and that is, due to any mechanical failure or any inoperability because of a collision, a fire, or any other such injury, temporarily inoperable under its own power.

"Impound lot" means a parcel of real property that is owned or leased by a government or operator at which motor vehicles are stored under appropriate protection.

"Operator" means a person or a firm licensed by the public utilities commission as a towing carrier.

"Public property" means any real property having its title, ownership, use, or possession held by the federal government; this state; or any county, municipality, as defined in section 31-1-101 (6), C.R.S., or other governmental entity of this state.

"Responsible law enforcement agency" means the law enforcement agency authorizing the original tow of an abandoned motor vehicle, whether or not the vehicle is towed to another law enforcement agency's jurisdiction.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire part amended with relocations, p. 468, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(1)(d) added, p. 172, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(1)(e) added, p. 1002, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(3) and (7) amended, (HB 09-1279), ch. 170, p. 763, § 1, effective August 5.

42-4-1803. Abandonment of motor vehicles - public property.

No person shall abandon any motor vehicle upon public property. Any sheriff, undersheriff, deputy sheriff, police officer, marshal, Colorado state patrol officer, or agent of the Colorado bureau of investigation who finds a motor vehicle that such officer has reasonable grounds to believe has been abandoned shall require such motor vehicle to be removed or cause the same to be removed and placed in storage in any impound lot designated or maintained by the law enforcement agency employing such officer.

If an operator is used by the responsible law enforcement agency to tow or impound the motor vehicle pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (1), the operator shall be provided with written authorization to possess the motor vehicle on a document that includes, without limitation, the year, make, model, vehicle identification number, and storage location.

Whenever any sheriff, undersheriff, deputy sheriff, police officer, marshal, Colorado state patrol officer, agent of the Colorado bureau of investigation, or agency employee finds a motor vehicle, vehicle, cargo, or debris, attended or unattended, standing upon any portion of a highway right-of-way in such a manner as to constitute an obstruction to traffic or proper highway maintenance, such officer or agency employee is authorized to cause the motor vehicle, vehicle, cargo, or debris to be moved to eliminate any such obstruction; and neither the officer, the agency employee, nor anyone acting under the direction of such officer or employee shall be liable for any damage to such motor vehicle, vehicle, cargo, or debris occasioned by such removal. The removal process is intended to clear the obstruction, but such activity should create as little damage as possible to the vehicle, or cargo, or both. No agency employee shall cause any motor vehicle to be moved unless such employee has obtained approval from a local law enforcement agency of a municipality, county, or city and county, the Colorado bureau of investigation, or the Colorado state patrol.

The operator shall be responsible for removing the motor vehicle and the motor vehicle debris from the site pursuant to this section, but shall not be required to remove or clean up any hazardous or commercial cargo the motor vehicle carried. The commercial carrier shall be responsible for removal or clean-up of the hazardous or commercial cargo.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire part amended with relocations, p. 470, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(1) amended and (3) added, (HB 09-1279), ch. 170, p. 763, § 2, effective August 5.

42-4-1804. Report of abandoned motor vehicles - owner's opportunity to request hearing.

Upon having an abandoned motor vehicle towed, the responsible law enforcement agency shall ascertain, if possible, whether or not the motor vehicle has been reported stolen, and, if so reported, such agency shall recover and secure the motor vehicle and notify its rightful owner and terminate the abandonment proceedings under this part 18. The responsible law enforcement agency and the towing carrier shall have the right to recover from the owner their reasonable costs and fees for recovering and securing the motor vehicle. Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize fees for services that were not provided or that were provided by another person or entity.

As soon as possible, but in no event later than ten working days after having an abandoned motor vehicle towed, the responsible law enforcement agency shall report the same to the department by first-class or certified mail, by personal delivery, or by internet communication. The report shall be on a form prescribed and supplied by the department.

The report shall contain the following information:

The fact of possession, including the date possession was taken, the location of storage of the abandoned motor vehicle and the location from which it was towed, the identity of the responsible law enforcement agency, and the business address, telephone number, and name and signature of a representative from the responsible law enforcement agency;

If applicable, the identity of the operator possessing the abandoned motor vehicle, together with the operator's business address and telephone number and the carrier number assigned by the public utilities commission; and

A description of the abandoned motor vehicle, including the make, model, color, and year, the number, issuing state, and expiration date of the license plate, and the vehicle identification number.

Upon receipt of a report made under subsection (1) or (6) of this section, the department shall search its records to ascertain the last-known owner of record for the abandoned motor vehicle and any lienholder as those persons are represented in department records.

If the vehicle is not registered with the department, the department shall conduct a title search with an entity that:

Has a national database;

May retrieve records based on both the vehicle identification number and vehicle registration number (license plate number); and

Provides the following information: The vehicle identification number, the vehicle registration number, the owner's name and contact information, and the lienholder's name and contact information.

Within ten working days after receipt of a report made under subsection (1) or (6) of this section, the department shall complete its search and shall transmit the report, together with all relevant information, to the responsible law enforcement agency or tow operator.

The responsible law enforcement agency, upon its receipt of the report required under subsection (2) of this section, shall determine, from all available information and after reasonable inquiry, whether the abandoned motor vehicle has been reported stolen, and, if so reported, such agency shall recover and secure the motor vehicle and notify its rightful owner and terminate the abandonment proceedings under this part 18. The responsible law enforcement agency and the operator shall have the right to recover from the owner their reasonable costs to recover and secure the motor vehicle.

If the responsible law enforcement agency does not use an operator to store the motor vehicle, the responsible law enforcement agency, within ten working days after the receipt of the report from the department required in subsection (2) of this section, shall notify by certified mail the owner of record, if ascertained, and any lienholder, if ascertained, of the fact of such report and the claim of any lien under section 42-4-1806. The notice shall contain information that the identified motor vehicle has been reported abandoned to the department, the location of the motor vehicle and the location from where it was towed, and that, unless claimed within thirty calendar days after the date the notice was sent as determined from the postmark on the notice, the motor vehicle is subject to sale.

If the responsible law enforcement agency uses an operator to store the motor vehicle, the responsible law enforcement agency, within ten working days after the receipt of the report from the department required in subsection (2) of this section, shall notify by first-class mail the owner of record, if ascertained, and any lienholder, if ascertained, of the fact of the report and the claim of any lien under section 42-4-1806. The notice shall contain information that the identified motor vehicle has been reported abandoned to the department, the location of the motor vehicle and the location from where it was towed, and that, unless claimed within thirty calendar days after the date the notice was sent as determined from the postmark on the notice, the motor vehicle is subject to sale.

The responsible law enforcement agency shall include in the notices sent pursuant to either paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection (4) a statement informing the owner of record of the opportunity to request a hearing concerning the legality of the towing of the abandoned motor vehicle, and the responsible law enforcement agency to contact for that purpose.

If an owner or lienholder requests a hearing, the owner or lienholder shall make the request in writing to the responsible law enforcement agency within ten days after the notice was sent, as determined by the postmark. Such hearing, if requested, shall be conducted pursuant to section 24-4-105, C.R.S., if the responsible law enforcement agency is the Colorado state patrol. If a local political subdivision is the responsible law enforcement agency, such hearing shall be conducted pursuant to local hearing procedures. If it is determined at the hearing that the motor vehicle was illegally towed upon request from a law enforcement agency, all towing charges and storage fees assessed against the vehicle shall be paid by such law enforcement agency.

The department shall maintain department-approved notice forms satisfying the requirements of subsection (4) of this section and shall make them available for use by local law enforcement agencies.

Except as provided in subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (a), an operator or its agent shall, no less than two days, but no more than ten days after a motor vehicle has been towed, determine who the owner is and if there is a lienholder and send a notice by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the last address of the owner and any lienholder as determined from records of the department or from a national search performed by the department.
(6) (a) (I) Except as provided in subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (a), an operator or its agent shall, no less than two days, but no more than ten days after a motor vehicle has been towed, determine who the owner is and if there is a lienholder and send a notice by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the last address of the owner and any lienholder as determined from records of the department or from a national search performed by the department.

If the department conducts a national title search in accordance with paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of this section, each day elapsing between the department being notified and the department returning information on the motor vehicle as a result of the search does not count against the tow operator's ten-day deadline to contact the motor vehicle's owner or any lienholder. This subparagraph (II) does not affect daily storage fees.

The cost of complying with this paragraph (a) is a cost of towing; except that the total of all costs of complying with this section shall not exceed one hundred fifty dollars. To comply with this subsection (6), the notice to the owner and lienholder must be sent within five days after the operator receives the information from the department and must contain the following information:

The fact of possession, including the date possession was taken, the location of storage of the motor vehicle, and the location from which it was towed;

The identity of the operator possessing the abandoned motor vehicle, together with the operator's business address and telephone number and the carrier number assigned by the public utilities commission; and

A description of the motor vehicle, including the make, model, color, and year and the number, issuing state, and expiration date of the license plate, or any other indicia of the motor vehicle's state of origin.

The operator shall not be entitled to recover any daily storage fees from the day the vehicle is towed until the day the owner and lienholder are notified, unless the operator reasonably attempts to notify the owner and lienholder by the date specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection (6). Sending a notice by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the owner and the lienholder as represented in department records shall be deemed a reasonable attempt to notify the owner and the lienholder. Failure to notify the owner and the lienholder due to the receipt of erroneous information from the department or a failure of the law enforcement agency to comply with this section shall not cause the loss of such storage fees accrued from the date the vehicle is towed until the owner and the lienholder receive such notice.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire part amended with relocations, p. 470, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(2), (3), IP(6)(a), and (6)(b) amended, (HB 09-1279), ch. 170, p. 764, § 3, effective August 5.

L. 2010:

(4) amended, (HB 10-1340), ch. 202, p. 877, § 1, effective May 5.

L. 2016:

(2) and IP(6)(a) amended, (HB 16-1056), ch. 325, p. 1319, § 1, effective August 10; (6)(a) amended, (SB 16-189), ch. 210, p. 799, § 127, effective August 10.

42-4-1805. Appraisal of abandoned motor vehicles - sale.

Abandoned motor vehicles or motor vehicles abandoned in an impound lot subsequent to a tow from public property shall be appraised by a law enforcement officer or an independent motor vehicle dealer and sold by the responsible law enforcement agency at a public or private sale held not less than thirty days nor more than sixty days after the date the notice required by section 42-4-1804 (4) was mailed.

Subject to section 42-4-1804, the operator may continue to charge for daily storage fees until the responsible law enforcement agency complies with this section.

If the appraised value of an abandoned motor vehicle sold pursuant to this section is three hundred fifty dollars or less, the sale shall be made only for the purpose of junking, scrapping, or dismantling such motor vehicle, and the purchaser thereof shall not, under any circumstances, be entitled to a Colorado certificate of title. The responsible law enforcement agency making the sale shall cause to be executed and delivered a bill of sale, together with a copy of the report described in section 42-4-1804 (2), to the person purchasing such motor vehicle. The bill of sale shall state that the purchaser acquires no right to a certificate of title for such vehicle. The responsible law enforcement agency making the sale shall promptly submit a report of sale, with a copy of the bill of sale, to the department and shall deliver a copy of such report of sale to the purchaser of the motor vehicle. Upon receipt of any report of sale with supporting documents on any sale made pursuant to this subsection (2), the department shall purge the records for such vehicle as provided in section 42-4-1810 (1)(b) and shall not issue a new certificate of title for such vehicle. Any certificate of title issued in violation of this subsection (2) shall be void.

If the appraised value of an abandoned motor vehicle sold pursuant to this section is more than three hundred fifty dollars, the sale may be made for any intended use by the purchaser. The responsible law enforcement agency making the sale shall cause to be executed and delivered a bill of sale, together with a copy of the report described in section 42-4-1804 (2), and an application for a Colorado certificate of title signed by a legally authorized representative of the responsible law enforcement agency conducting the sale, to the person purchasing such motor vehicle. The purchaser of the abandoned motor vehicle shall be entitled to a Colorado certificate of title upon application and proof of compliance with the applicable provisions of the "Certificate of Title Act", part 1 of article 6 of this title, within fourteen days after the sale; except that, if such vehicle is less than five years old, including the current year model, and if the department does not provide the name of an owner of record to the law enforcement agency, the purchaser shall apply for a bonded title and the department shall issue such bonded title upon the applicant meeting the qualifications for such title pursuant to rules promulgated by the department.

Transferring the title of a motor vehicle to an operator to satisfy a debt created pursuant to this part 18 shall not be deemed to be the sale of a motor vehicle.

Nothing in this section requires an operator to be licensed pursuant to part 1 of article 20 of title 44 for purposes of conducting activities under this part 18.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire part amended with relocations, p. 473, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(3) amended, p. 555, § 1, effective March 7.

L. 2004:

(1) amended, p. 612, § 3, effective January 1, 2005.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (HB 09-1279), ch. 170, p. 765, § 4, effective August 5.

L. 2017:

(4)(b) amended, (SB 17-240), ch. 395, p. 2066, § 54, effective July 1.

L. 2018:

(4)(b) amended, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 142, § 20, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-1806 as it existed prior to 2002, and the former § 42-4-1805 was relocated to § 42-4-2103.

42-4-1806. Liens upon towed motor vehicles.

Whenever an operator who is registered with the department in accordance with subsection (2) of this section recovers, removes, or stores a motor vehicle upon instructions from any duly authorized law enforcement agency or peace officer who has determined that such motor vehicle is an abandoned motor vehicle, such operator shall have a possessory lien, subject to the provisions of section 42-4-1804 (6), upon such motor vehicle and its attached accessories or equipment for all fees for recovering, towing, and storage as authorized in section 42-4-1809 (2)(a). Such lien shall be a first and prior lien on the motor vehicle, and such lien shall be satisfied before all other charges against such motor vehicle.

No operator shall have a possessory lien upon a motor vehicle described in subsection (1) of this section unless said operator is registered with the department. Such registration shall include the following information:

The location of the operator's tow business;

The hours of operation of the operator's tow business;

The location of the impound lot where vehicles may be claimed by the owner of record; and

Any information relating to a violation of any provision contained in this part 18 or of any other state law or rule relating to the operation, theft, or transfer of motor vehicles.

The executive director of the department may cancel the registration of any operator if an administrative law judge finds, after affording the operator due notice and an opportunity to be heard, that the operator has violated any of the provisions set forth in this part 18.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire part amended with relocations, p. 473, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-1807 as it existed prior to 2002, and the former § 42-4-1806 was relocated to § 42-4-1805.

42-4-1807. Perfection of lien.

The lien provided for in section 42-4-1806 shall be perfected by taking physical possession of the motor vehicle and its attached accessories or equipment and by sending to the department within ten working days after the time possession was taken a notice containing the information required in the report to be made under the provisions of section 42-4-1804. In addition, such report shall contain a declaration by the operator that a possessory lien is claimed for all past, present, and future charges, up to the date of redemption, and that the lien is enforceable and may be foreclosed pursuant to the provisions of this part 18.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire part amended with relocations, p. 474, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-1808 as it existed prior to 2002, and the former § 42-4-1807 was relocated to § 42-4-1806.

42-4-1808. Foreclosure of lien.

Any motor vehicle and its attached accessories and equipment or personal property within or attached to such vehicle that are not redeemed by the last-known owner of record or lienholder after such owner or lienholder has been sent notice of such lien by the operator or responsible law enforcement agency shall be sold in accordance with the provisions of section 42-4-1805.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire part amended with relocations, p. 474, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-1809 as it existed prior to 2002, and the former § 42-4-1808 was relocated to § 42-4-1807.

42-4-1809. Proceeds of sale.

If the sale of any motor vehicle, personal property, and its attached accessories or equipment under the provisions of section 42-4-1805 produces an amount less than or equal to the sum of all charges of the operator who has perfected his or her lien, then the operator shall have a valid claim against the owner for the full amount of such charges, less the amount received upon the sale of such motor vehicle. Failure to register such vehicle in accordance with this title shall constitute a waiver of such owner's right to be notified pursuant to this part 18 for the purposes of foreclosure of the lien pursuant to section 42-4-1808. Such charges shall be assessed in the manner provided for in paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of this section.

If the sale of any motor vehicle and its attached accessories or equipment under section 42-4-1805 produces an amount greater than the sum of all charges of the operator who has perfected his or her lien:

The entity receiving the proceeds shall first satisfy the operator's reasonable fee arising from the sale of the motor vehicle and the cost and fees of towing and storing the abandoned motor vehicle, subject to a maximum charge specified in rules promulgated by the public utilities commission that govern nonconsensual tows by towing carriers.

Any balance remaining after payment pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) shall be paid to the responsible law enforcement agency to satisfy the cost of mailing notices, having an appraisal made, advertising and selling the motor vehicle, and any other costs of the responsible law enforcement agency including administrative costs, taxes, fines, and penalties due.

In the case of the sale of an abandoned motor vehicle described in section 42-4-1802 (1)(d), any balance remaining after payment pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection (2) shall be paid to the law enforcement agency that is owed a fee for the court-ordered placement of an immobilization device on the motor vehicle pursuant to section 42-4-1105.

Any balance remaining after payment pursuant to paragraphs (b) and (b.5) of this subsection (2) shall be forwarded to the department, and the department may recover from such balance any taxes, fees, and penalties due and payable to it with respect to such motor vehicle.

Any balance remaining after payment pursuant to paragraph (c) of this subsection (2) shall be paid by the department: First, to any lienholder of record as the lienholder's interest may appear upon the records of the department; second, to any owner of record as the owner's interest may so appear; and then to any person submitting proof of such person's interest in such motor vehicle upon the application of such lienholder, owner, or person. If such payments are not requested and made within one hundred twenty days after the sale of the abandoned motor vehicle, the balance shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the highway users tax fund for allocation and expenditure as specified in section 43-4-205 (5.5)(e), C.R.S.

The provisions of paragraphs (a) and (b) of subsection (2) of this section shall not apply to a responsible law enforcement agency operating under a towing contract.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire part amended with relocations, p. 474, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(2)(d) amended, p. 150, § 28, effective April 5.

L. 2006:

(2)(b.5) added and (2)(c) amended, p. 172, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2014:

IP(2) and (2)(a) amended, (HB 14-1031), ch. 14, p. 126, § 2, effective August 6.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-1810 as it existed prior to 2002, and the former § 42-4-1809 was relocated to § 42-4-1808.

42-4-1810. Transfer and purge of certificates of title.

Whenever any motor vehicle is abandoned and removed and sold in accordance with the procedures set forth in this part 18, the department shall transfer the certificate of title or issue a new certificate of title or shall purge such certificate of title in either of the following cases:

Upon a person's submission to the department of the necessary documents indicating the abandonment, removal, and subsequent sale or transfer of a motor vehicle, the department shall transfer the certificate of title or issue a new certificate of title for such abandoned motor vehicle.

Upon a person's submission of documents indicating the abandonment, removal, and subsequent wrecking or dismantling of a motor vehicle, including all sales of abandoned motor vehicles with an appraised value under three hundred fifty dollars that are conducted pursuant to section 42-4-1805 (2), the department shall keep the records for one year and then purge the records for such abandoned motor vehicle; except that the department shall not be required to wait before purging the records if the purchaser is a licensed motor vehicle dealer.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire part amended with relocations, p. 475, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(1)(b) amended, p. 204, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(1)(b) amended, (HB 09-1279), ch. 170, p. 766, § 5, effective August 5.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-1811 as it existed prior to 2002, and the former § 42-4-1810 was relocated to § 42-4-1809.

42-4-1811. Penalty.

Unless otherwise specified in this part 18, any person who knowingly violates any of the provisions of this part 18 commits a class 2 misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire part amended with relocations, p. 476, § 1, effective July 1; entire section amended, p. 1562, § 371, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-1812 as it existed prior to 2002, and the former § 42-4-1811 was relocated to § 42-4-1810. The amendments to this section in House Bill 02-1046 were harmonized with this section as it appeared in Senate Bill 02-132.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

42-4-1812. Exemptions.

Nothing in this part 18 shall be construed to include or apply to the driver of any disabled motor vehicle who temporarily leaves such vehicle on the paved or improved and main-traveled portion of a highway, subject, when applicable, to the emergency lighting requirements set forth in section 42-4-230.

Nothing in this part 18 shall be construed to include or apply to authorized emergency motor vehicles while such vehicles are actually and directly engaged in, coming from, or going to an emergency.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire part amended with relocations, p. 476, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-1813 as it existed prior to 2002, and the former § 42-4-1812 was relocated to § 42-4-1811.

42-4-1813. Local regulations.

The state or any county, municipality as defined in section 31-1-101 (6), C.R.S., or other governmental entity of the state may execute a contract or contracts for the removal, storage, or disposal of abandoned motor vehicles within the area of its authority to effectuate the provisions of this part 18.

The provisions of this part 18 may be superseded by ordinance or resolution of a municipality, as defined in section 31-1-101, C.R.S., or any county that sets forth procedures for the removal, storage, and disposal of abandoned or illegally parked motor vehicles on public property; except that such ordinance or resolution shall not deprive an operator of a lien attached and perfected under this part 18.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire part amended with relocations, p. 476, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(2) amended, (HB 09-1279), ch. 170, p. 766, § 6, effective August 5.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-1814 as it existed prior to 2002, and the former § 42-4-1813 was relocated to § 42-4-1812.

42-4-1814. Violation of motor vehicle registration or inspection laws - separate statutory provision.

Owners of motor vehicles impounded by the Colorado state patrol for violation of motor vehicle registration or inspection laws shall receive notice and the opportunity for a hearing pursuant to the provisions of section 42-13-106. If such a motor vehicle is found to be abandoned in accordance with the provisions of said section 42-13-106, the notice and hearing provisions to owners of motor vehicles under other sections of this part 18 shall be deemed to have been met for purposes of proper disposition of the motor vehicle under the terms of this part 18. Nevertheless, the notice and hearing provisions of the other sections of this part 18 as to lienholders are applicable and shall not be deemed to have been met by the provisions of section 42-13-106 or this section.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire part amended with relocations, p. 476, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-1815 as it existed prior to 2002, and the former § 42-4-1814 was relocated to § 42-4-1813.